Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.080

Promoting prostitution in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in the second degree if he or she knowingly:

(a) Profits from prostitution; or

(b) Advances prostitution.

(2) Promoting prostitution in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 413; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.080.]